Utah statutes.
36-24-101.   Review of new programs and agencies.

(1)  When legislation is passed that creates a new program or agency, the legislative sponsor shall consider providing that the funding for the first fiscal year should be nonlapsing, with the option of continuing the nonlapsing money for an additional year.

(2)  The legislative interim committee with oversight responsibility for the new program or agency:

(a)  shall hear the limited scope audit report prepared by the Office of Legislative Auditor General as provided in Section 36-12-15 on or before the committee's November meeting;

(b)  shall review each new program or agency on which it receives a report  to assure that it is being implemented in a manner consistent with its statutory directive;

(c)  shall determine whether the statutory directive is being followed and whether any change in law is necessary and if a change in law is necessary, make that recommendation to the Legislature; and

(d)  may request the Office of Legislative Auditor General to conduct a more in-depth review of the program or agency.

(3)  The legislative appropriations subcommittee with oversight responsibility for the new program or agency:

(a)  shall hear the limited scope audit report prepared by the Office of Legislative Auditor General as provided in Section 36-12-15 on or before the committee's November meeting;

(b)  shall review each new program or agency on which it receives a report  to determine whether the agency is appropriately using the funds provided; and

(c)  may request the Office of Legislative Auditor General to conduct a more in-depth review of the program or agency.



Amended by Chapter 342, 2011 General Session

